Hawaii statutes.
§431:15-337 Reopening liquidation.
After the liquidation proceeding has been terminated and the liquidator
discharged, the commissioner or other interested party may at any time petition
the circuit court of the first judicial circuit to reopen the proceedings for
good cause, including the discovery of additional assets. If the court is
satisfied that there is justification for reopening, it shall so order. [L
1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next